Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.650.045

Digital citizenship, internet safety, and media literacy—Best practices and recommendations—Annual review—Model policy update and checklist for future updates.

(1)(a) By December 1, 2016, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop best practices and recommendations for instruction in digital citizenship, internet safety, and media literacy, and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, on strategies to implement the best practices and recommendations statewide. The best practices and recommendations must be developed in consultation with an advisory committee as specified in (b) of this subsection. Best practices and recommendations must include instruction that provides guidance about thoughtful, safe, and strategic uses of online and other media resources, and education on how to apply critical thinking skills when consuming and producing information.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must convene and consult with an advisory committee when developing best practices and recommendations for instruction in digital citizenship, internet safety, and media literacy. The advisory committee must include: Representatives from the Washington state school directors' association; experts in digital citizenship, internet safety, and media literacy; teacher-librarians as defined in RCW 28A.320.240; and other stakeholders, including parent associations, educators, and administrators. Recommendations produced by the committee may include, but are not limited to:

(i) Revisions to the state learning standards for educational technology, required under RCW 28A.655.075;

(ii) Revisions to the model policy and procedures on electronic resources and internet safety developed by the Washington state school directors' association;

(iii) School district processes necessary to develop customized district policies and procedures on electronic resources and internet safety;

(iv) Best practices, resources, and models for instruction in digital citizenship, internet safety, and media literacy; and

(v) Strategies that will support school districts in local implementation of the best practices and recommendations developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under (a) of this subsection.

(2) Beginning in the 2017-18 school year, a school district shall annually review its policy and procedures on electronic resources and internet safety. In reviewing and amending the policy and procedures, a school district must:

(a) Involve a representation of students, parents or guardians, teachers, teacher-librarians, other school employees, administrators, and community representatives with experience or expertise in digital citizenship, media literacy, and internet safety issues;

(b) Consider customizing the model policy and procedures on electronic resources and internet safety developed by the Washington state school directors' association;

(c) Consider existing school district resources; and

(d) Consider best practices, resources, and models for instruction in digital citizenship, internet safety, and media literacy, including methods to involve parents.

(3)(a) By December 1, 2017, the Washington state school directors' association shall review and revise its model policy and procedures on electronic resources and internet safety to better support digital citizenship, media literacy, and internet safety in schools. The model policy and procedures must contain provisions requiring that media literacy resources consist of a balance of sources and perspectives.

(b) By December 1, 2017, the Washington state school directors' association shall develop a checklist of items for school districts to consider when updating their policy and procedures under subsection (2) of this section.

[ 2017 c 90 s 2; 2016 c 59 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2016 c 59: "The legislature recognizes that as technology becomes more prevalent, students must learn how to safely, ethically, responsibly, and effectively use technology. The legislature intends to provide a process in which students, parents or guardians, teachers, teacher-librarians, other school employees, administrators, and community representatives will engage in an ongoing discussion on safe technology use, internet use, digital citizenship, and media literacy as part of implementing the state's basic education goal outlined in RCW 28A.150.210(3) and essential academic learning requirements for technology outlined in RCW 28A.655.075." [ 2016 c 59 s 1.]